Ohio, session 136, HB313.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 122.635 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 122.635. (A) As used in this section, "major 7
workforce housing project" means a project that reserves at 8
least twenty units, designed for residential occupancy by at 9
least twenty individuals or families living independently from 10
each other, for households earning between sixty and one hundred 11
per cent of the median income for the county where the project 12
is located, as determined by the director of development 13
pursuant to section 174.04 of the Revised Code. 14
(B) The department of development shall provide grants to 15
townships and municipal corporations that adopt and implement at 16
least three pro-housing policies in accordance with this 17
section. A township or municipal corporation may apply for such 18
a grant in the form and manner prescribed by the department. The 19
application shall, at minimum, include both of the following: 20

H. B. No. 313 Page 2
As Introduced
(1) Documentation or other evidence that shows the 21
township or municipal corporation has adopted and implemented at 22
least three of the pro-housing policies described in division 23
(D) of this section; 24
(2) A description of how the township or municipal 25
corporation intends to utilize the grant funds received. 26
(C) The department shall review applications and award 27
grants under this section annually, to the extent that funds are 28
available, provided that no township or municipal corporation 29
may receive more than fifteen per cent of the total funds 30
available, regardless of the number of applicants. 31
(D) The department shall apportion all of the available 32
funds among the first fifty townships and municipal corporations 33
that submit an application each fiscal year and that 34
demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the department, that the 35
township or municipal corporation has adopted and implemented at 36
least three pro-housing policies, including at least one pro- 37
housing policy from each of divisions (F)(1), (2), and (3) of 38
this section. 39
(E)(1) Each of the townships and municipal corporations 40
described in division (D) of this section shall receive a 41
portion of the available funds. 42
(2) Subject to division (C) of this section, the 43
department shall reserve at least twenty-five per cent of the 44
available funds for townships and municipal corporations that 45
have adopted and implemented six or more of the pro-housing 46
policies described in division (F) of this section. 47
(3) The department shall determine the allocation of funds 48
other than those reserved under division (E)(2) of this section 49

H. B. No. 313 Page 3
As Introduced
based on population. 50
(F) All of the following are pro-housing policies for 51
purposes of this section: 52
(1)(a) Having no or minimal parking requirements for 53
developments that include residential units; 54
(b) Allowing parcels to include four or more dwelling 55
units that are designed for residential occupancy by four or 56
more individuals or families living independently from each 57
other in at least seventy-five per cent of the territory of the 58
township or municipal corporation; 59
(c) Repealing minimum lot size requirements for 60
developers; 61
(d) Having reduced, by at least fifty per cent, the 62
portion of territory within the township or municipal 63
corporation that is zoned for single-family use only, as 64
compared to the portion of territory zoned for that purpose ten 65
years before the application date. 66
(2)(a) Subsidizing or decreasing costs related to water or 67
sewer connections for major workforce housing projects; 68
(b) Acquiring and readying sites that are ready to be 69
financed and built upon by housing developers; 70
(c) Providing incentives related to increased density to 71
developers that provide low-income housing and workforce housing 72
in census tracts that are at or above the area median income; 73
(d) Providing incentives for modular housing or 74
manufactured homes; 75
(e) Adopting road regulations and specifications for 76

H. B. No. 313 Page 4
As Introduced
county roads recommended by the department of transportation for 77
all roads constructed for the purpose of housing projects; 78
(f) Adopting a building code that does not mandate a 79
specific style of exterior cladding or finish materials for 80
residential buildings. 81
(3)(a) Having a process in place to reduce the time it 82
takes to review and complete all regulatory approvals for 83
housing developments by at least thirty per cent or that reduces 84
the time it takes to review and grant permits to four months or 85
less; 86
(b) Having a pre-approval process in place to create an 87
expedited review and granting of permits for a diverse range of 88
developers; 89
(c) Having an expedited approval process for development 90
plans sharing ninety per cent of the elements of a development 91
plan that was previously approved; 92
(d) Having a housing plan, adopted within the five years 93
preceding that application date, that tracks the needs, gaps, 94
and potential strategies for increasing housing across all 95
income levels within the township or municipal corporation for 96
at least the next ten years and identifies opportunities to 97
reduce the regulatory burden on housing development; 98
(e) Having policies that preserve existing moderate and 99
low-income housing; 100
(f) Allowing accessory dwelling units. 101
(G) A township or municipal corporation that receives a 102
grant under this section shall use at least half of the funds 103
for the following purposes: 104

H. B. No. 313 Page 5
As Introduced
(1) Providing capital for housing development through 105
grants or loans; 106
(2) Supporting first-time home buyers; 107
(3) Providing funds for home repairs for low-income 108
homeowners; 109
(4) Providing funds for multi-family building improvements 110
for low- and middle-income landlords; 111
(5) Enforcing zoning and residential building regulations; 112
(6) Enforcing anti-discrimination housing regulations; 113
(7) Providing funds for tenant protection and empowerment; 114
(8) Acquiring and readying sites for housing development; 115
(9) Funding a conversion under the rental assistance 116
demonstration program; 117
(10) Providing long-term housing for difficult to house 118
populations. 119
(H) Townships and municipal corporations that receive a 120
grant under this section shall provide documentation sufficient 121
to prove, to the satisfaction of the department, that at least 122
half of the funds are used for the purposes specified in 123
division (G) of this section. A township or municipal 124
corporation that does not expend at least half of the funds for 125
the purposes specified in division (G) of this section shall not 126
receive funds under this section for five years following the 127
date those funds were expended improperly. 128
(I) The housing accelerator fund is created in the state 129
treasury. Money in the fund shall be used by the department to 130
provide grants under this section and section 175.42 of the 131

H. B. No. 313 Page 6
As Introduced
Revised Code. All investment earnings of the fund shall be 132
credited to the fund. 133
Section 2. All items in this act are hereby appropriated 134
as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the 135
credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations 136
made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 137
2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. 138
The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to 139
any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. 140
Section 3. 141
142
1 2 3 4 5
A DEV DEPARTMENT OF DEVELOPMENT
B General Revenue Fund
C GRF 1954A6 Housing Accelerator $50,000,000 $50,000,000
D TOTAL General Revenue Fund $50,000,000 $50,000,000
E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $50,000,000 $50,000,000
HOUSING ACCELERATOR 143
The foregoing appropriation item 1954A6, Housing 144
Accelerator, shall be used to support housing development 145
incentive programs under section 122.635 of the Revised Code. 146
An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance 147
of appropriation item 1954A6, Housing Accelerator, at the end of 148
fiscal year 2026 is hereby reappropriated to the same 149
appropriation item for the same purpose in fiscal year 2027. 150

H. B. No. 313 Page 7
As Introduced
Section 4. Within the limits set forth in this act, the 151
Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts 152
indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation 153
made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which 154
appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from 155
operating appropriations contained in this act shall be 156
accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all 157
applicable provisions of, the main operating appropriations act 158
of the 136th General Assembly. 159